Hawaii statutes.
[§482-54] Severability. If any provision of this chapter is
deemed to be invalid, the remaining provisions of this chapter shall continue
to be effective. [L 2008, c 108, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next